District of Columbia statutes.
34-302

Approval of construction of gas or electric plant.

No person shall begin the construction of a gas plant or an electric plant without first having obtained the permission and approval of the Commission.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 987, ch. 150, § 8, par. 56
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 201(l), 47 DCR 1091

History

1981 Ed., § 43-1002.
1973 Ed., § 43-602.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-107 rewrote the section which formerly provided: “No gas corporation or electrical corporation shall begin the construction of a gas plant or electric plant without first having obtained the permission and approval of the Commission.”

Effect of Amendments